District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0732.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Prearrest Diversion Task Force Recommendations Emergency
Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Section 1507 of the Criminal Justice Coordinating Council for the District of
Columbia Establishment Act of 2001, effective June 8, 2024 (D.C. Law 25-175; D.C. Official
Code § 22-4237), is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (g) is amended by striking the phrase “Within 3 months after
the applicability date of section 29 of the Secure DC Omnibus Amendment Act of 2024, passed
on 2nd reading on March 5, 2024 (Enrolled version of Bill 25-345),” and inserting the phrase
“No later than June 2025,” in its place.
(b) Subsection (h) is amended by striking the phrase “Within one year after
the applicability date of section 29 of the Secure DC Omnibus Amendment Act of 2024, passed
on 2nd reading on March 5, 2024 (Enrolled version of Bill 25-345),” and inserting the phrase
“No later than July 31, 2026,” in its place.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and shall remain in effect for no longer than
90 days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in section
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
412(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788;
D.C. Official Code § 1-204.12(a)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2